Delaware, session 153, SB113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Subchapter I, Chapter 11, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1106A. Division of Legislative Services. There is created a Division of Legislative Services to assist the Director of the Division of Legislative Services in performing the functions assigned under Â§ 1107 of this title and other State law. Section 2. Amend Â§ 1110, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1110. Controller General; responsibility; duties; compensation. (a) (1) The Council shall appoint a Controller General who, primarily, shall work with and assist the General Assemblyâs Joint Finance Committee and Joint Committee on Capital Improvement. (3) There is created an Office of the Controller General to assist the Controller General in performing the functions assigned under this section and other State law.